Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-31] Penalties prescribed by this
chapter additional to other penalties. If conduct prohibited by or under
the authority of this chapter is also made unlawful by another or other laws,
the offender may be convicted as provided in this chapter and for the violation
of the other law or laws. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next